Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-109
Department heads; serve without term; exception.

Each head of a department shall serve without term.

Laws 1919, c. 190, § 8, p. 438;

C.S.1922, § 7249;

C.S.1929, § 81-111;

R.S.1943, § 81-109;

Laws 1963, c. 335, § 4, p. 1101;

Laws 1953, c. 506, § 1, p. 1613;

Laws 1963, c. 507, § 2, p. 1614;

Laws 1965, c. 543, § 2, p. 1730;

Laws 1981, LB 249, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 36, § 37;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 104.

Provision relating to fixation of term has no application to Department of Aeronautics. State ex rel. Beck v. Obbink, 172 Neb. 242, 109 N.W.2d 288 (1961).

Possibility of removal from office does not prevent officer from having definite term. State ex rel. Laughlin v. Johnson, 156 Neb. 671, 57 N.W.2d 531 (1953).

Head of department herein referred to represents exactly the same head of executive department referred to in the Constitution. State ex rel. Johnson v. Chase, 147 Neb. 758, 25 N.W.2d 1 (1946).